Florida, session 2026, SB1518.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSubsection (6) of section 1003.455, Florida 11 Statutes, is amended to read: 12 1003.455âPhysical education; assessment.â 13 (6)âIn addition to the requirements in subsection (3), each 14 district school board shall provide at least 100 minutes of 15 supervised, safe, and unstructured free-play recess each week 16 for students in kindergarten through grade 8 5 so that there are 17 at least 20 consecutive minutes of free-play recess per day. 18 This requirement does not apply to charter schools. 19 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.